Washington statutes.
RCW 6.19.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Adverse claimant" means a person, other than the judgment debtor or defendant, who claims title or right to possession of property levied on.

(2) "Levying creditor" means the judgment creditor or plaintiff who obtained the writ of execution or attachment under which levy was made.

[ 1987 c 442 s 501.]